Louisiana, session 2026, SB445.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:407.30(B) and (D)(1)(a) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§407.30. Louisiana Early Childhood Education Fund
A. There is hereby created in the state treasury a special fund to be known as
the Louisiana Early Childhood Education Fund, hereafter in this Section referred to
as the "fund".
B. After satisfying the requirements of the Bond Security and
Redemption Fund as provided in Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution
of Louisiana, except as otherwise provided by law, monies shall be deposited
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-980 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 445
into the fund as follows:
(1) The avails of the monies provided for in R.S. 39:82(J).
(2) Beginning July 1, 2027, at the beginning of each fiscal year, the state
treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to transfer from the state general
fund the difference between thirty million dollars and the unencumbered
balance in the fund at the beginning of the fiscal year immediately prior. In no
event shall any such deposit be greater than thirty million dollars in any given
fiscal year. Monies shall be utilized for the purpose of matching one-to-one
grants provided for in this Section that have received the approval of the Board
of Elementary and Secondary Education.
(3) Any appropriations, public or private grants, gifts, or donations received
by the state or the Department of Education for the purposes of this Section, other
than federal funds for the Child Care and Development Fund Program, shall also be
credited to the fund.
* * *
D.(1)(a) The fund shall be administered by the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education. Subject to legislative appropriation, monies Monies in the
fund shall be awarded annually to local entities approved by the board for the
purpose of funding projects that will expand the number of early childhood care and
education quality slots for families who are eligible for the Child Care Assistance
Program in Type III early learning centers that have at least one classroom with
children age fifteen months or younger if a local entity provides funds from nonstate
and nonfederal sources. No such award shall be made unless the local entity's
financial commitment to the project proposed for funding provides matching funds
from nonstate and nonfederal sources at a rate of at least one-to-one.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 39:82(J) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§82. Remission of cash balances to the state treasurer; authorized withdrawals of
state monies after the close of the fiscal year; reports
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-980 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 445
* * *
J. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section, the office of behavioral
health, Louisiana Department of Health, may retain any unexpended funds in
accordance with the provisions of R.S. 28:26 the treasurer shall deposit all cash
balances of any state funds occurring from any appropriations made by
legislative act or the Interim Emergency Board to the Department of Education
at the end of each fiscal year into the Louisiana Early Childhood Education
Fund. Provided, however, the provisions of this Subsection shall not apply to
any dedicated funds that would otherwise be retained by the respective funds
or state funds for which a bona fide liability exists on the last day of each fiscal
year.
* * *
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without the
signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of
Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act
shall become effective on the say following such approval.